Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201476-3001
Terms, defined.

For
purposes of sections 76-3001 to 76-3004:

(1) Decommissioning security means a security instrument that is posted
or given by a wind developer to a municipality or other governmental
entity to ensure sufficient funding is available for removal of
a wind energy conversion system and reclamation at the end of the useful life
of such a system; and

(2) Wind agreement means a right, whether or not stated in the form
of a restriction, easement, covenant, or condition, in any deed, wind easement,
wind option, or lease or lease option securing land for the study or production
of wind-generated energy or any other instrument executed by or on behalf
of any owner of land or air space for the purpose of allowing another party
to study the potential for, or to develop, a wind energy conversion system
as defined in section 66-909.02 on the land or in the air space.

Laws 2009, LB568, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB208, § 5;

Laws 2012, LB828, § 16.